Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-802
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the State Lottery Act is to establish lottery games which will raise revenue for the purposes set forth in section 9-812.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 18.